Washington statutes.
RCW 26.09.050

Decrees—Contents—Restraining orders—Enforcement—Notice of termination or modification of restraining order.

(1) In entering a decree of dissolution of marriage or domestic partnership, legal separation, or declaration of invalidity, the court shall determine the marital or domestic partnership status of the parties, make provision for a parenting plan for any minor child of the marriage or domestic partnership, make provision for the support of any child of the marriage or domestic partnership entitled to support, consider or approve provision for the maintenance of either spouse or either domestic partner, make provision for the disposition of property and liabilities of the parties, make provision for the allocation of the children as federal tax exemptions, make provision for any necessary continuing restraining orders including the provisions contained in RCW 9.41.800, make provision for the issuance within this action of the restraint provisions of a domestic violence protection order or an antiharassment protection order under chapter 7.105 RCW, and make provision for the change of name of any party.

(2) Restraining orders issued under this section restraining or enjoining the person from molesting or disturbing another party, or from going onto the grounds of or entering the home, workplace, or school of the other party or the day care or school of any child, or prohibiting the person from knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining within, a specified distance of a location, a protected party's person, or a protected party's vehicle, shall prominently bear on the front page of the order the legend: VIOLATION OF THIS ORDER WITH ACTUAL NOTICE OF ITS TERMS IS A CRIMINAL OFFENSE UNDER CHAPTER 7.105 RCW AND WILL SUBJECT A VIOLATOR TO ARREST.

(3) The court shall order that any restraining order bearing a criminal offense legend, any domestic violence protection order, or any antiharassment protection order granted under this section, in addition to the law enforcement information sheet or proof of service of the order, be forwarded by the clerk of the court on or before the next judicial day to the appropriate law enforcement agency specified in the order. Upon receipt of the order, the law enforcement agency shall enter the order into any computer-based criminal intelligence information system available in this state used by law enforcement agencies to list outstanding warrants. The order is fully enforceable in any county in the state.

(4) If a restraining order issued pursuant to this section is modified or terminated, the clerk of the court shall notify the law enforcement agency specified in the order on or before the next judicial day. Upon receipt of notice that an order has been terminated, the law enforcement agency shall remove the order from any computer-based criminal intelligence system.

[ 2021 c 215 s 132; 2008 c 6 s 1008; 2000 c 119 s 6; 1995 c 93 s 2; 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 451; 1989 c 375 s 29; 1987 c 460 s 5; 1973 1st ex.s. c 157 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.

Application—2000 c 119: See note following RCW 10.31.100.

Finding—Intent—Severability—1994 sp.s. c 7: See notes following RCW 43.70.540.

Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 7 ss 401-410, 413-416, 418-437, and 439-460: See note following RCW 9.41.010.